District of Columbia statutes.
34-1259.06

Submission of correspondence by cable operator.

A cable operator shall submit to the Office copies of all correspondence, petitions, reports, applications, and other documents between the cable operator and federal agencies having appropriate jurisdiction in matters affecting cable operation, or any District agencies within 10 days of such correspondence, petitions, reports, applications, and other documents being submitted or received by the cable operator, or within a time set forth in a franchise agreement, whichever is lesser.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 906
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334